Indiana, session 2026, HB1316.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-9-2-5.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.2. "Adoption or foster care service", for purposes
of IC 31-10-3.5, refers to any one (1) or more of the following:
(1) Promoting foster parenting.
(2) Coordinating placement of a child in a home or facility
licensed under IC 31-27.
(3) Recruiting a foster parent or an adoptive parent.
(4) Licensing or certifying a foster family home.
(5) Promoting adoption.
(6) Assisting with an adoption or supporting an adoptive
parent.
(7) Performing or assisting with a home study.
(8) Assisting with a kinship guardianship or a kinship
caregiver.
(9) Providing any family preservation service.
(10) Providing any family support service or temporary
2026 IN 1316—LS 6642/DI 148


family reunification service.
SECTION 2. IC 31-9-2-40.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 40.9. "Discriminate", for purposes of IC 31-10-3.5,
includes any one (1) or more of the following acts when done solely
based on a person's sincerely held religious belief:
(1) Denying or otherwise making unavailable any funding to
the person, including:
(A) a state grant;
(B) a loan;
(C) a scholarship;
(D) a guarantee; or
(E) an entitlement or a state benefit.
(2) Terminating, altering the terms of, or refusing to enter
into a contract with the person, including a subcontract or
cooperative agreement.
(3) Refusing to recognize or taking any adverse action against
a person's:
(A) license;
(B) certificate;
(C) custody award or agreement; or
(D) any other similar status.
(4) Refusing to place a child with the person.
(5) Altering in any way the person's tax treatment, including:
(A) imposing a tax penalty;
(B) denying or otherwise making unavailable an exemption
from taxation; or
(C) disallowing or otherwise making unavailable a
deduction for state tax purposes of any charitable donation
made by or to the person.
(6) Imposing on the person any of the following:
(A) A monetary fine.
(B) A fee.
(C) A penalty.
(D) A damages award.
(E) An injunction.
SECTION 3. IC 31-9-2-89, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2016,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 89. (a) "Person", for purposes of IC 31-19-19,
IC 31-19-25, and the juvenile law, means:
(1) a human being;
(2) a corporation;
2026 IN 1316—LS 6642/DI 148


(3) a limited liability company;
(4) a partnership;
(5) an unincorporated association; or
(6) a governmental entity.
(b) "Person", for purposes of section 44.5 of this chapter, means an
adult or a minor.
(c) "Person", for purposes of IC 31-27, means an individual who is
at least twenty-one (21) years of age, a corporation, a partnership, a
voluntary association, or other entity.
(d) "Person", for purposes of the Uniform Child Custody
Jurisdiction Act under IC 31-21, has the meaning set forth in
IC 31-21-2-13.
(e) "Person", for purposes of the Uniform Interstate Family Support
Act under IC 31-18.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 31-18.5-1-2.
(f) "Person", for purposes of IC 31-10-3.5, means:
(1) an individual; or
(2) a legal entity, including a religious organization.
SECTION 4. IC 31-9-2-107.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107.2. "Religious organization",
for purposes of section 89 of this chapter, refers to any of the
following:
(1) A house of worship, including a church, synagogue, shrine,
mosque, or temple.
(2) A religious:
(A) group;
(B) corporation;
(C) association;
(D) school or educational institution;
(E) ministry;
(F) order;
(G) society; or
(H) entity, regardless of whether the entity is integrated or
affiliated with a house of worship.
(3) Any officer, owner, employee, manager, religious leader,
clergy, or minister of an entity described in this section.
SECTION 5. IC 31-9-2-119.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 119.5. "State benefit", for
purposes of section 40.9 of this chapter, means any program
administered, controlled, or funded by the state that provides any
one (1) or more of the following:
2026 IN 1316—LS 6642/DI 148


(1) Cash.
(2) Payments.
(3) Grants.
(4) Contracts.
(5) Loans.
(6) In-kind assistance.
SECTION 6. IC 31-10-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.5. Antidiscrimination in Adoption and Foster
Proceedings
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a governmental
entity may not discriminate against any of the following:
(1) A person that provides, or declines to provide, an adoption
or foster care service in a manner consistent with the person's
sincerely held religious belief.
(2) An adoptive parent (as defined in IC 31-9-2-6) who raises,
or intends to raise, a child in a manner consistent with the
adoptive parent's sincerely held religious belief.
(3) A foster parent (as defined in IC 31-9-2-47) who raises, or
intends to raise, a child in a manner consistent with the foster
parent's sincerely held religious belief.
(4) A person that in a matter concerning adoption or foster
care service:
(A) maintains any policy and procedure; or
(B) otherwise acts;
consistent with the person's sincerely held religious belief.
(b) A governmental entity may consider whether a person
described in subsection (a) shares the same religion or faith
tradition as a child when considering placement of the child to
prioritize the child's placement with a person of the same religion
or faith tradition.
Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding IC 34-13-3-3 and subject to
subsection (b), a person may bring a cause of action against a
governmental entity for a violation of section 1 of this chapter.
(b) A person may not bring a cause of action against any court
under this section.
(c) A person does not need to exhaust any administrative
remedy before commencing an action under this section.
Sec. 3. Relief against the governmental entity may include any
of the following:
(1) Declaratory relief.
2026 IN 1316—LS 6642/DI 148


(2) Injunctive relief.
(3) Compensatory damages.
(4) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
SECTION 7. IC 34-11-2-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17. An action against a governmental entity for
discrimination under IC 31-10-3.5-2 must be commenced not more
than two (2) years after the date of the act complained of.
2026 IN 1316—LS 6642/DI 148